Idaho, session 2026, H0548.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-7028, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-7028. ENFORCEMENT. The sheriffs and deputy sheriffs of the respec-
tive counties shall be primarily responsible for the enforcement of this
chapter and in the exercise of their authority may, upon reasonable suspi-
cion that a violation has occurred, stop and board any vessel subject to law.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.